Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 52.30.040 and 1984 c 230 s 79 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A fire protection district with a fully-paid fire department may, by resolution of its board of fire commissioners, provide for civil service in its fire department in the same manner, with the same powers, and with the same force and effect as provided by chapter 41.08 RCW for cities, towns, and municipalities, including restrictions against the discharge of an employee because of residence outside the limits of the fire protection district.(2) A fire protection district that has adopted civil service in its fire department as provided for in subsection (1) of this section may dissolve its civil service system if:(a) Its board of fire commissioners adopts a resolution to dissolve the civil service system; and(b) A majority of the civil service employees employed by the fire protection district vote to dissolve the civil service system within 60 calendar days of the adoption of the resolution by the board of fire commissioners.--- END ---